Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 1

Junkyard Control Act of 1967

54-20-101. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Junkyard Control Act of 1967.”

Acts 1967, ch. 304, § 1; T.C.A., § 54-2301.

Cross-References. Automobile graveyards or junkyards, licensing and control, § 7-51-701.

Dealers in secondhand automobile tires and accessories, title 55, ch. 14.

Junkyard control, scenic routes, §§ 54-17-108, 54-17-110.

Attorney General Opinions. Private act that imposes less stringent setback requirements for junkyards located along state highways than are required by general law is compatible with public statutes governing junkyards along state highways, OAG 05-032 (3/29/05).

Comparative Legislation. Junkyard control:

Ala. Code § 23-1-240 et seq.

Ark. Code § 27-74-401 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 32-6-240 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 177.905 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 49-25-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 226.650 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 136-141 et seq.

Va. Code § 33.1-348.

54-20-102. Purpose of part.

For the purpose of promoting the public safety, health, welfare, convenience and enjoyment of public travel, to protect the public investment in public highways, and to preserve and enhance the scenic beauty of lands bordering public highways, it is declared to be in the public interest to regulate and restrict the establishment, operation and maintenance of junkyards in areas adjacent to the interstate and primary systems within this state.

The general assembly finds and declares that junkyards that do not conform to the requirements of this part are public nuisances.

Acts 1967, ch. 304, § 2; T.C.A., § 54-2302.

Cited: State v. Smith, 618 S.W.2d 474, 1981 Tenn. LEXIS 457 (Tenn. 1981).

54-20-103. Part definitions.

As used in this part:

“Automobile graveyard” means any establishment or place of business that is maintained, used or operated for storing, keeping, buying, or selling wrecked, scrapped, ruined, or dismantled motor vehicles or motor vehicle parts. Ten (10) or more of those vehicles constitute an automobile graveyard;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of transportation;

“Department” means the department of transportation;

“Interstate system” means that portion of the national system of interstate and defense highways located within this state, as officially designated, or as may hereafter be so designated, by the department of transportation and approved by the United States secretary of transportation, pursuant to title 23 of the United States Code;

“Junk” means old or scrap copper, brass, rope, rags, batteries, paper, trash, rubber, debris, waste, or junked, dismantled or wrecked automobiles, or parts of junked, dismantled or wrecked automobiles, iron, steel, and other old or scrap ferrous or nonferrous material;

“Junkyard” means an establishment or place of business that is maintained, operated, or used for storing, keeping, buying, or selling junk, or for the maintenance or operation of an automobile graveyard. “Junkyard” includes scrap metal processors, used auto parts yards, yards providing temporary storage of automobile bodies or parts awaiting disposal as a normal part of the business operation, when the business will continually have like materials located on the premises, garbage dumps and sanitary landfills;

“Junkyard” does not include a recycling center;

“Main traveled way” means the traveled way of a highway on which through traffic is carried. In case of a divided highway, the traveled way of each of the separated roadways for traffic in opposite directions is a main traveled way. “Main traveled way” does not include such facilities as frontage roads, turning roadways, or parking areas;

“Primary system” means that portion of connected main highways, as officially designated, or as may hereafter be so designated, by the Tennessee department of transportation, and approved by the United States secretary of transportation, pursuant to title 23 of the United States Code; and

“Recycling center” means an establishment, place of business, facility or building that is maintained, operated, or used for the storing, keeping, buying or selling of newspaper or used food or beverage containers for the purpose of converting those items into a usable product.

Impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; Acts 1967, ch. 304, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; Acts 1974, ch. 720, § 1; T.C.A., § 54-2303; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12; 1981, ch. 432, § 1.

54-20-104. Restrictions as to location along certain highways.

No person shall establish, operate, or maintain a junkyard, any portion of which is within one thousand feet (1,000') of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of any interstate or primary highway, except the following:

Those that are screened by natural objects, plantings, fences, or other appropriate means so as not to be visible from the main traveled way of the system, or otherwise removed from sight;

Those located within areas that are zoned for industrial use under authority of law;

Those located within unzoned industrial areas, which areas shall be determined from actual land uses and defined by regulations to be promulgated by the commissioner; and

Those that are not visible from the main traveled way of the system.

Acts 1967, ch. 304, § 4; 1971, ch. 369, § 2; T.C.A., § 54-2304; Acts 1981, ch. 432, § 2.

Collateral References.

Validity, construction, and application of zoning ordinance relating to operation of junkyard of scrap metal processing plant. 50 A.L.R.3d 837.

54-20-105. Screening by department of transportation.

Any junkyard lawfully in existence on October 1, 1969, that is within one thousand feet (1,000') of the nearest edge of the right-of-way and visible from the main traveled way of any highway on the interstate or primary system, shall be screened, if feasible, by the department at locations on the highway right-of-way or in areas acquired for those purposes outside the right-of-way, so as not to be visible from the main traveled way of the highways, and the operator shall pay the cost of installation. The commissioner is authorized to seek federal aid funds available for the purpose of screening to help defray the operation cost.

Acts 1967, ch. 304, § 5; 1971, ch. 369, §§ 1, 3; T.C.A., § 54-2305; Acts 1981, ch. 432, § 3.

54-20-106. Rulemaking power of commissioner.

The commissioner is given the authority to promulgate and enforce rules and regulations required to carry out this part and 23 U.S.C. § 136, and to define those types of materials suitable for screening.

Acts 1967, ch. 304, § 6; 1971, ch. 369, § 2; T.C.A., § 54-2306; Acts 1981, ch. 432, § 4; 1988, ch. 513, § 1.

54-20-107. Acquisition of interests in lands — Removal — Screening.

Whenever the department determines that the topography of the land adjoining the highway will not permit adequate screening of the junkyards, or the screening of the junkyards would not be economically feasible, the department shall have the authority to acquire by gift, purchase, exchange, or condemnation interests in lands as may be necessary to secure the relocation, removal, or disposal of the junkyards, and to pay for the costs of the relocation, removal, or disposal.

When the department determines that it is in the best interest of the state, it may acquire lands, or interests in lands, as may be necessary to provide adequate screening of the junkyards.

Acts 1967, ch. 304, § 7; 1971, ch. 369, § 1; T.C.A., § 54-2307; Acts 1981, ch. 432, § 5.

54-20-108. Nuisance — Injunction.

The department may apply to any court in the county in which the junkyards are located for an injunction to abate the nuisance.

The district attorneys general are authorized to assist the department in the enforcement of this part.

Acts 1967, ch. 304, § 8; 1971, ch. 369, §§ 1, 4; T.C.A., § 54-2308; Acts 1981, ch. 432, § 6.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — Prosecution, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 477.

54-20-109. More restrictive law unaffected.

Nothing in this part shall be construed to abrogate or affect any lawful ordinance, regulation, or resolution that is more restrictive than this part.

Acts 1967, ch. 304, § 9; T.C.A., § 54-2309.

Attorney General Opinions. Private act is appropriate way to put regulations allowed by §§ 54-20-109 and 54-20-122 in place, OAG 05-032 (3/29/05).

54-20-110. Agreements with federal government authorized.

The commissioner is authorized to enter into agreements with the United States secretary of transportation as provided by title 23 of the United States Code relating to the control of junkyards in areas adjacent to the interstate and primary systems, and to take action in the name of the state to comply with the terms of the agreement.

Acts 1967, ch. 304, § 10; 1971, ch. 369, § 2; T.C.A., § 54-2310; Acts 1981, ch. 432, § 7.

54-20-111. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 54-20-111 (Acts 1972, ch. 490, § 1; T.C.A., § 54-2311; Acts 1981, ch. 432, § 8), concerning submission of report by commissioner, was repealed by Acts 1992, ch. 736, § 1.

54-20-112. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 54-20-112 (Acts 1974, ch. 720, § 2; T.C.A., § 54-2312), concerning issuance of vehicle junkyard concealment control permits, was repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 432, § 13. For new law see § 54-20-113.

54-20-113. Unlawful locations of vehicle junkyards — Local regulation.

It is unlawful for any junkyard located within one thousand feet (1,000') of the nearest edge of the right-of-way of any interstate or primary highway to operate without a junkyard control permit, which permits are authorized to be issued by the commissioner.

Permits shall be valid for the fiscal year for which issued and shall be subject to renewal from year to year.

Each application for an original or renewal permit shall be accompanied by a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00), which is not subject to either proration or refund.

All fees shall be deposited to the highway fund for the administration of this section.

Acts 1974, ch. 720, § 3; 1979, ch. 94, § 1; T.C.A., § 54-2313; Acts 1981, ch. 432, § 9.

Cross-References. City streets excluded unless part of state or federal highway system, § 54-20-123.

Junkyards prohibited along scenic routes, § 54-17-108.

Local regulation of junkyards, § 54-20-122.

Cited: State v. Smith, 618 S.W.2d 474, 1981 Tenn. LEXIS 457 (Tenn. 1981).

Collateral References.

Validity, construction and application of zoning ordinance relating to operation of junkyard or scrap metal processing plant. 50 A.L.R.3d 837.

54-20-114 — 54-20-121. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 54-20-114 — 54-20-121 (Acts 1974, ch. 720, §§ 4-11; T.C.A., §§ 54-2314 — 54-2321), concerning vehicle junkyard permits, were repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 432, § 14; 1981, ch. 449, § 2(44). For new law see §§ 54-20-113, 54-20-122 — 54-20-124.

54-20-122. Local regulation of junkyards.

Nothing contained in this part shall be construed as prohibiting the legislative authority of cities and towns from regulating junkyards within their respective jurisdictions; provided, that the rules or regulations are at least as stringent as those promulgated pursuant to the authority contained in this part.

Any metropolitan, city or county rule, regulation, ordinance or zoning provision that regulates, prohibits or controls junkyards or scrapyards shall not be construed to apply to, include, prohibit, or regulate recycling centers, as defined in § 54-20-103.

Acts 1981, ch. 432, § 10.

Cross-References. City streets excluded unless part of state or federal highway system, § 54-20-123.

County zoning, title 13, ch. 7, part 1.

Municipal planning regulations, title 13, ch. 4, part 3.

Municipal zoning outside boundaries, title 13, ch. 7, part 3.

Regional planning regulations, title 13, ch. 3, part 4.

Regulation of zoning by metropolitan governments, § 7-3-304.

Attorney General Opinions. Private act is appropriate way to put regulations allowed by §§ 54-20-109 and 54-20-122 in place, OAG 05-032 (3/29/05).

54-20-123. Applicability of part.

All provisions of this part, except § 54-20-113, shall apply to automotive dismantlers and recyclers, as defined in § 55-17-102, that are licensed pursuant to §§ 55-17-109(b) and 55-17-112.

It is the express legislative intent that this part not include a city street unless the city street is also a state or federal highway.

This part shall not apply to any solid waste processing facility or disposal facility or site that is registered in accordance with § 68-211-106.

Any person who operates an established place of business licensed pursuant to § 55-17-102 to sell used cars or parts and engages in the business of automotive dismantling or recycling, as defined in § 55-17-102, without the license required pursuant to § 55-17-109(b) shall be considered in violation of this part.

Acts 1981, ch. 432, §§ 12, 15; 1983, ch. 355, § 1; 1988, ch. 513, § 2; 1988, ch. 746, § 1.

Cross-References. Local regulation of junkyards, § 54-20-122.

54-20-124. Violations — Penalty.

Any person who establishes, operates or maintains a junkyard, or who fails to obtain a permit, contrary to this part commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Each day's subsequent violation constitutes a separate offense.

Acts 1981, ch. 432, § 11; 1988, ch. 746, § 2; 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Cited: Fiser v. Knoxville, 584 S.W.2d 659, 1979 Tenn. App. LEXIS 314 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1979).